Tennessee statutes. Title 4 State Government
Part 1

Arts Commission

4-20-101. Commission created — Regional representation.

There is created and established a state commission to be known as the Tennessee arts commission, to consist of fifteen (15) members broadly representative of all fields of the performing, visual and literary arts, to be appointed by the governor from among citizens of the state who have demonstrated a vital interest in the performing, visual or literary arts.

In making appointments to the arts commission, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the commission is a member of a racial minority.

There shall be at least one (1) but not more than two (2) members from each United States congressional district in Tennessee. Such members' residency shall be determined by the congressional district in which such members are registered to vote.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 1; 1978, ch. 688, § 1; T.C.A., § 4-2001; Acts 1980, ch. 680, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 6.

Compiler's Notes. The Tennessee arts commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§4-29-112,4-29-243.

Cross-References. Allocation of funds from cultural motor vehicle plates to arts commission, §55-4-215.

4-20-102. Members — Tenure — Vacancies — Expenses — Officers.

Terms shall be for five (5) years.

No member of the commission who serves a full five-year term shall be eligible for reappointment during a one-year period following the expiration of such member's term.

All vacancies shall be filled for the balance of the unexpired term in the same manner as original appointments.

The members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of their duties as members of the commission.

All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

The commission will annually elect its chair and other officers.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(9); T.C.A., § 4-2002.

4-20-103. Executive director — Staff — Advisory panels.

The governor shall appoint an executive director for the Tennessee arts commission. The executive director shall have broad experience in art agency management. Prior to appointing the executive director, the governor shall request that the Tennessee arts commission conduct a search for qualified candidates. The commission shall submit to the governor at least three (3) interested and qualified candidates. The commission shall submit additional candidates at the governor's request. The governor shall appoint the executive director from among the recommendations submitted by the commission. In the event of a vacancy, the governor shall appoint a new executive director. The governor or the commission shall remove the executive director for neglect of duty or other just cause.

The executive director shall employ other officers, experts and employees as may be needed and shall fix their compensation within the amounts made available for such purposes. Employment of staff members is subject to the approval of the commissioner of human resources.

The commission may also, at its discretion, form advisory panels from qualified persons within the state to obtain their advice and counsel on matters pertaining to the arts. Members of these panels shall serve at the will and pleasure of the commission and will receive no compensation.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 3; T.C.A., § 4-2003; Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3; 2012, ch. 986, § 19.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2007, ch. 60, § 3 provided that the references to the department of personnel are changed to the department of human resources, effective April 24, 2007.

Acts 2012, ch. 986, § 48 provided that all rules, regulations, orders, and decisions heretofore issued or promulgated by any of the boards or commissions, which the act terminates or merges into another board or commission, shall remain in full force and effect. In the case of the boards or commissions that are merged with another board or commission by the act, all final rules, regulations, orders, and decisions together with any matters that are pending on October 1, 2012, shall hereafter be administered, enforced, modified, or rescinded in accordance with the law applicable to the continuing board or commission.

4-20-104. Duties and objectives.

The duties and objectives of the commission are to:

Stimulate and encourage throughout the state the study and presentation of the performing, visual and literary arts and public interest and participation therein;

Encourage participation in, appreciation of, and education in the arts to meet the legitimate needs and aspirations of persons in all parts of the state;

Take such steps as may be necessary and appropriate to encourage public interest in the cultural heritage of our state, to expand the state's cultural resources and to promote the use of art in the state government's activities and facilities; and

Encourage excellence and assist freedom of artistic expression essential for the well-being of the arts.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 4; T.C.A., § 4-2004.

4-20-105. Powers.

The commission is authorized and empowered to:

Hold public hearings;

Enter into contracts, within the limit of funds available therefor, with individuals, organizations and institutions for services furthering the objectives of the commission's programs;

Enter into contracts, within the limit of funds available therefor, with local and regional associations for cooperative endeavors furthering the objectives of the commission's programs;

Accept gifts, contributions and bequests of unrestricted funds from individuals, foundations, corporations and other organizations or institutions for the purpose of furthering the objectives of the commission's programs;

Make and sign any agreements and do and perform any acts that may be necessary to carry out the purposes of this part; and

Promulgate rules and regulations pursuant to the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in chapter 5 of this title.

The commission may request and shall receive from any department, division, board, bureau, commission or agency of this state such assistance and data as will enable it properly to carry out its powers and duties under this part.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 5; T.C.A., § 4-2005; Acts 1986, ch. 708, § 3.

Cross-References. State museum, supervision and administration, §4-12-101.

4-20-106. Federal funds.

The commission is the official agency of the state to receive and disburse appropriate funds made available by the federal government for programs related to the performing, visual and literary arts, and the preservation of architecture, art or artifacts.

Acts 1967, ch. 2, § 6; T.C.A., § 4-2006.

4-20-107. Duties as to underserved and underrepresented artists and art organizations.

The executive director shall employ at least one (1) full-time employee who shall perform the following duties:

Identify the traditionally underserved and underrepresented ethnic minority, people with a disability, elderly, and rural artists and arts organizations within the state;

Periodically survey such artists and arts organizations in order to determine the level of grant program participation among such artists and organizations;

Review with the executive director and the members of the Tennessee arts commission the grant process and award system in order to identify barriers to equal opportunity for such artists and arts organizations with regard to recruitment, selection, training, technical assistance, funding, benefits and special conditions for each arts grant program administered by or through any entity of state government;

Report, at least once each year, to the arts commission and to the members of the general assembly concerning the level of grant program participation by such artists and arts organizations and make recommendations pertaining thereto; and

Undertake other appropriate activities to assure equitable participation by the traditionally underserved and underrepresented ethnic minority, people with a disability, elderly, and rural artists and arts organizations within this state with regard to grant programs administered by or through entities of state government.

Acts 1988, ch. 866, § 1; 2011, ch. 47, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 107 provided that nothing in the legislation shall be construed to alter or otherwise affect the eligibility for services or the rights or responsibilities of individuals covered by the provision on the day before the date of enactment of this legislation, which was July 1, 2011.

Acts 2011, ch. 47, § 108 provided that the provisions of the act are declared to be remedial in nature and all provisions of the act shall be liberally construed to effectuate its purposes.

Cross-References. Reporting requirement satisfied by notice to general assembly members of publication of report, §3-1-114.